Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB538.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 67C.111 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All cities other than those of the first class located within the territory of the
consolidated local government, upon the successful passage of the question to
consolidate a city of the first class and its county, shall remain incorporated unless
dissolved in accordance with KRS 81.094 and shall continue to exercise all powers
and perform the functions permitted by the Constitution and general laws of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky applicable to the cities of the class to which they have
been assigned.
(2) (a) After July 15, 2024, with the approval of the consolidated local government's
legislative council, qualified voters within the consolidated local government
may establish new cities within the consolidated local government pursuant to
KRS 81.050 and 81.060. The proposed city must have a population of three
thousand (3,000)[six thousand (6,000)] or greater. This territory shall not be
within any urban services boundary of the consolidated local government nor
shall it include any territory currently incorporated within any existing city.
The approval of the desire to establish a new city shall be in the form of a
resolution by the consolidated local government's legislative council. If the
legislative council does not act upon the request within sixty (60) days of the
receipt of the desire to incorporate a new city, that shall serve as notice of
approval by the legislative council of the incorporation of the new city.
(b) If the petition to form a city is signed by a number of registered and qualified
voters residing in the area proposed to be incorporated which is equal to at
least seventy-five percent (75%) of the total number of votes cast in the area
in the last preceding presidential election, the consolidated local government's
legislative council shall approve the proposed incorporation.
Page 1 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
(c) If the petition to form a city is signed by a number of registered and qualified
voters residing in the area proposed to be incorporated which is less than
seventy-five percent (75%) of the total number of votes cast in the area in the
last preceding presidential election, the consolidated local government's
legislative council may approve the proposed incorporation.
(d) An action of the consolidated local government's legislative council approving
an incorporation passed by the consolidated local government legislative
council shall not be subject to veto by the mayor of the consolidated local
government.
(3) (a) Any proposed annexation by a city in that county shall first receive the
approval of the legislative council of the consolidated local government prior
to the city proceeding under the provisions of KRS Chapter 81A. The city
shall request the approval of the consolidated legislative council by ordinance.
For requests filed after July 15, 2024:
1. If the ordinance is accompanied by a petition in favor of the proposed
annexation signed by a number of registered and qualified voters
residing in the area proposed to be annexed which is equal to at least
seventy-five percent (75%) of the total number of votes cast in the area
in the last preceding presidential election, the consolidated local
government shall approve the proposed annexation; or
2. If the ordinance is accompanied by written consent of the owners of
record of the area to be annexed when that area is vacant or is otherwise
unimproved land and where no persons reside, the consolidated
government legislative council shall approve the proposed annexation.
A city shall not annex vacant or otherwise unimproved land where no
persons reside as set out by this subparagraph more than once every four
(4) calendar years.
Page 2 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
(b) The consolidated legislative council's decision shall be made by ordinance
and within sixty (60) days of the receipt of the request by the affected city. If
an ordinance has not been enacted by the consolidated legislative council
within sixty (60) days, the request for a city to proceed with an annexation
proposal shall be deemed to be approved by the consolidated legislative
council. An ordinance approving annexation passed by the consolidated local
government legislative council shall not be subject to veto by the mayor of the
consolidated local government.
(c) 1. A city in a county containing a consolidated local government shall not
annex commercial real estate primarily for the purpose of obtaining
occupational license taxes, net profits, or gross receipts taxes unless
each owner of record of property within the area to be annexed gives
prior consent in writing to the annexation.
2. a. As used in this paragraph, "commercial real estate" means any
parcel of real estate that is:
i. Lawfully used primarily for sales, retail, wholesale, office,
research, institutional, warehouse, manufacturing, or
industrial purposes;
ii. Lawfully used primarily for multifamily residential purposes
involving five (5) or more dwelling units; or
iii. Zoned as a business or commercial use by a planning unit
under the provisions of KRS Chapter 100.
b. "Commercial real estate" does not include single-family residential
units such as condominiums, townhouses, manufactured homes, or
homes or lots in a subdivision when sold, or residential units
otherwise conveyed on a unit-by-unit basis, even if those units are
part of a larger building or parcel of real estate containing more
Page 3 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
than four (4) residential units.
(4) The adoption of a consolidated local government in a county containing a city
of the first class shall not prevent the merger or dissolution of any existing
cities as provided by law or the merger of any remaining cities with the newly
consolidated local government.
Section 2. KRS 65.003 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The governing body of each city, county, urban-county, consolidated local
government, and charter county, shall adopt, by ordinance, a code of ethics
which shall apply to all elected officials of the city, county, urban-county,
consolidated local government, or charter county, and to appointed officials
and employees of the city, county, urban-county, consolidated local
government, or charter county government, or agencies created jointly, as
specified in the code of ethics. The elected officials of a city, county, or
consolidated local government to which a code of ethics shall apply include
the mayor, county judge/executive, members of the governing body, county
clerk, county attorney, sheriff, jailer, coroner, surveyor, and constable but do
not include members of any school board. Agencies created jointly may
include planning or administrative commissions or boards. Candidates for the
local government elective offices specified in this subsection shall comply
with the annual financial disclosure statement filing requirements contained in
the code of ethics.
(b) The boards, officers, and employees of special purpose governmental entities
shall be subject to a code of ethics as provided in KRS 65A.070. As used in
this section, special purpose governmental entity has the same meaning as in
KRS 65A.010.
(2) Any city, county, or consolidated local government may enter into a memorandum
of agreement or an interlocal agreement with one (1) or more other cities, counties,
Page 4 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
or consolidated local governments for joint adoption of a code of ethics which shall
apply to all elected officials of the cities, counties, or consolidated local
governments, and to appointed officials and employees as specified by each of the
cities, counties, or consolidated local governments which enters into the agreement.
Interlocal agreements shall be executed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act
in KRS 65.210 to 65.300. The interlocal agreement or memorandum of agreement
may provide for but shall not be limited to:
(a) The provision of administrative services relating to the implementation of a
code of ethics;
(b) The creation of a regional ethics board which serves independently to provide
advice to member governments and their officials and provides for the
enforcement of locally adopted codes of ethics; and
(c) Contracting by a memorandum of agreement with an area development
district for the provision of administrative services relating to the
implementation of a code of ethics.
Candidates for the city, county, or consolidated local government elective offices
specified in this subsection shall comply with the annual financial disclosure
statement filing requirements contained in the code of ethics.
(3) Each code of ethics adopted as provided by subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or
amended as provided by subsection (4) of this section, shall include but not be
limited to provisions which set forth:
(a) Standards of conduct for elected and appointed officials and employees;
(b) Requirements for creation of financial disclosure statements, which shall be
filed annually by all candidates for the city, county, or consolidated local
government elective offices specified in subsection (1) of this section, elected
officials of each city, county, or consolidated local government, and other
officials or employees of the city, county, or consolidated local government,
Page 5 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
as specified in the code of ethics, and which shall be filed with the person or
group responsible for enforcement of the code of ethics;
(c) A policy on the employment of members of the families of officials or
employees of the city, county, or consolidated local government, as specified
in the code of ethics; and
(d) The designation of a person or group who shall be responsible for
enforcement of the code of ethics, including maintenance of financial
disclosure statements, all of which shall be available for public inspection,
receipt of complaints alleging possible violations of the code of ethics,
issuance of opinions in response to inquiries relating to the code of ethics,
investigation of possible violations of the code of ethics, and imposition of
penalties provided in the code of ethics.
(4) The code of ethics ordinance adopted by a city, county, or consolidated local
government may be amended but shall not be repealed.
(5) (a) Within twenty-one (21) days of the adoption of the code of ethics required by
this section, each city, county, or consolidated local government shall deliver
a copy of the ordinance by which the code was adopted and proof of
publication in accordance with KRS Chapter 424 to the Department for Local
Government. The Department for Local Government shall maintain the
ordinances as public records and shall maintain a list of city, county, or
consolidated local governments which have adopted a code of ethics and a list
of those which have not adopted a code of ethics.
(b) Within twenty-one (21) days of the amendment of a code of ethics required by
this section, each city, county, or consolidated local government shall:
1. Deliver a copy of the ordinance by which the code was amended and
proof of publication in accordance with KRS Chapter 424 to the
Department for Local Government, which shall maintain the amendment
Page 6 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
with the ordinance by which the code was adopted; and
2. Deliver a copy of the ordinance by which the code was amended to the
governing body of each special purpose governmental entity that
follows that establishing entity's code of ethics pursuant to KRS
65A.070.
(c) For ordinances adopting or amending a code of ethics under this section, cities
of the first class and consolidated local governments shall comply with the
publication requirements of KRS 83A.060(9), notwithstanding the exception
contained in that statute.
(6) If a city, county, or consolidated local government fails to comply with the
requirements of this section, the Department for Local Government shall notify all
state agencies, including area development districts, which deliver services or
payments of money from the Commonwealth to the city, county, or consolidated
local government. Those agencies shall suspend delivery of all services or payments
to the city, county, or consolidated local government which fails to comply with the
requirements of this section. The Department for Local Government shall
immediately notify those same agencies when the city, county, or consolidated local
government is in compliance with the requirements of this section, and those
agencies shall reinstate the delivery of services or payments to the city, county, or
consolidated local government.
(7) Notwithstanding KRS 67C.103(14)(e), a simple majority of the legislative council
of a consolidated local government may delegate its authority to issue
administrative subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the
production of documents relevant to possible violations of the code of ethics to the
person or a majority of the group responsible for enforcement of a code of ethics.
Subpoenas shall be served in the same manner as subpoenas for witnesses in civil
cases. Compliance with the subpoenas shall be enforceable by the Circuit Court.
Page 7 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
Any failure to obey an order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt
thereof.
(8) (a) In a consolidated local government, an ethics commission shall be
responsible for enforcement of the code of ethics of the consolidated local
government and shall consist of seven (7) members chosen as follows:
1. Before January 1, 2029:
a. Three (3) members appointed by the mayor of the consolidated
local government; and
b. Four (4) members appointed by the legislative council of the
consolidated local government with two (2) being appointed by
each of the largest two (2) political caucuses of the legislative
council.
2. On and after January 1, 2029:
a. One (1) member appointed by the chief audit executive of the
office of internal audit of the consolidated local government;
b. Two (2) members appointed by the mayor of the consolidated
local government; and
c. Four (4) members appointed by the legislative council of the
consolidated local government with two (2) being appointed by
each of the largest two (2) political caucuses of the legislative
council.
(b) No more than three (3) members of the ethics commission shall be members
of the same political party. The terms of the members shall be for four (4)
years.
Section 3. KRS 67C.103 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a consolidated local government, except as otherwise
specified in KRS 67C.101 to 67C.137, shall be vested in a consolidated local
Page 8 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
government council. The members of the council shall be nominated and elected by
district. There shall be only one (1) council member elected from each council
district.
(2) There shall be twenty-six (26) council districts. The initial boundaries, population,
and numerical designation of the council districts shall be as specified by KRS
67C.135. The population of the council districts shall be as nearly equal as is
reasonably possible. Any changes made to alter the boundaries of council districts
shall be based on the population of the county as determined by the most recent
United States Census or official census estimates as provided by the United States
Bureau of the Census.
(3) Following the official publication of each decennial census by the United States
Bureau of the Census for the area embraced by a consolidated local government, the
council shall adopt an ordinance, if necessary, to redistrict the council districts. A
redistricting ordinance shall ensure that council districts:
(a) Are composed of units no smaller than precincts, and each individual
precinct composes the same territory as it did at the time of redistricting in
response to the most recent decennial census;
(b) Not be drawn in a manner as to contain two (2) or more actively serving
council persons in the same district;
(c) Provide for the distribution of population [among the council districts ]as
nearly equal as is reasonably possible without altering a precinct or its
boundaries as established in response to the most recent decennial census;
[. ]
(d) Are[Every council district shall be] compact and contiguous; and
(e) [shall ]Respect existing neighborhood, community, and city boundaries
whenever possible.
(4) The consolidated local government council members shall serve for a term of four
Page 9 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
(4) years beginning on the first Monday in January following their election, except
that the initial election of council members shall be in a manner as to provide for
staggered terms for council members. At the initial election of the members of a
consolidated local government council, those representing even-numbered districts
shall be elected for a two (2) year term. Those representing odd-numbered districts
shall be elected for a four (4) year term. Thereafter, all council members shall be
elected for four (4) year terms.
(5) The members of a consolidated local government council shall be nominated and
elected from the district in which they reside in nonpartisan elections. After the
initial terms of office of the first elected council members, council members shall
be elected in the same election years as other local government officials as
regulated by the regular election laws of the Commonwealth and as provided in
subsection (4) of this section.
(6) No person shall be eligible to serve as a member of a consolidated local government
council unless he or she is at least eighteen (18) years old, a qualified voter, and a
resident within the territory of the consolidated local government and the district
that he or she seeks to represent for at least one (1) year immediately prior to the
person's election. A council member shall continue to reside within the district from
which he or she was elected throughout the term of office.
(7) The presiding officer of a consolidated local government council shall be a
president who shall be chosen annually by a majority vote of the entire council from
among its members at the first meeting of the council in January. The council
president has the right to introduce any resolution or recommend any ordinance and
shall be entitled to vote on all matters.
(8) The consolidated local government council shall upon notice meet within seven (7)
days after its members have taken office, and shall thereafter hold at least one (1)
regular meeting per month. No newspaper notice shall be required for regular or
Page 10 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
special meetings of the consolidated local government council. However, notice of
all meetings of the council and all meetings of committees of the council shall be
held pursuant to KRS 61.805 to 61.850.
(9) A majority of the members of the consolidated local government council shall
constitute a quorum, but a smaller number may adjourn from day to day. The
consolidated local government council may enforce the attendance of members by
rules or ordinances with appropriate fines. The mayor or two-thirds (2/3) of the
entire membership of the council may call a special meeting at any time. Meetings
shall be held in such places in the county as are provided by ordinance, and the
place of meetings shall not be changed except by an ordinance for which two-thirds
(2/3) of the members of the consolidated local government council have voted.
(10) The council shall determine its own rules and order of business, and keep and
provide a public record of its proceedings. The council shall provide for the
publication of all ordinances in a composite code of ordinances.
(11) Council ordinances that prescribe penalties for their violation shall be enforced
through the entire area of the consolidated local government unless:
(a) Otherwise provided by statute; or
(b) The legislative body of any city within the consolidated local government area
has adopted an ordinance pertaining to the same subject matter that is the
same as or more stringent than the standards set forth in the consolidated local
government's ordinance.
(12) (a) In the case of a vacancy on the consolidated local government council by
reason of death, resignation, or removal, a nonpartisan election shall be held
to fill the unexpired term, unless paragraph (c) of this subsection applies. The
county clerk shall be responsible for administering the election. The election
shall proceed as follows:
1. The presiding officer of the council shall declare the position vacant and
Page 11 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
issue a writ of election within twenty-four (24) hours of the occurrence
of the vacancy;
2. The writ shall be signed by the presiding officer, shall designate the day
for holding the election, and shall be delivered to the sheriff;
3. Candidates for the unexpired term shall file petitions of nomination with
the county clerk not later than ten (10) days following the declaration of
vacancy. The election shall be held sixty (60) days after the declaration
of vacancy on the next Tuesday which is not a federal holiday under 5
U.S.C. sec. 6103(a), unless paragraph (b) of this subsection applies. The
petition for nomination shall contain the signatures of two (2) registered
voters of the council district and shall meet the requirements of KRS
118.315(2); and
4. The successful candidate elected to fill an unexpired term in the office
of consolidated local government council member shall take office
immediately upon certification of the election results and administration
of the oath of office.
(b) If the unexpired term will not end on the first Monday in January following
the next regular election, and if less than three (3) months intervene before
that regular election, the unexpired term shall be filled on the date set for the
regular election. Candidates for full terms shall be grouped together, and
candidates for unexpired terms shall be grouped together, under appropriate
headings, so that the voter may easily distinguish the candidates for full terms
from the candidates for unexpired terms.
(c) If the unexpired term will end on the first Monday in January following the
next regular election, and if less than three (3) months intervene before that
regular election, the presiding officer of the council shall appoint a qualified
person to fill the vacancy and serve the remainder of the term.
Page 12 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
(d) The order of the names on the ballot for the candidates shall be determined by
lot at a public drawing to be held in the office of the county clerk at 4 p.m.,
standard time, ten (10) days following the declaration of vacancy.
(13) All legislative powers of a consolidated local government are vested in the
consolidated local government council. The term "legislative power" is to be
construed broadly and shall include the power to:
(a) Enact ordinances, orders, and resolutions, and override a veto of the mayor by
a two-thirds (2/3) majority of the membership of the legislative council;
(b) Review the budgets of and appropriate money to the consolidated local
government;
(c) Adopt a budget ordinance;
(d) Levy taxes, subject to the limitations of the Constitution and the laws of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(e) Establish standing and temporary committees; and
(f) Make independent audits and investigations concerning the affairs of the
consolidated local government and any board or commission that:
1. Is composed of members who are appointed by the mayor and approved
by the legislative council; or
2. Has a budget that is equal to or greater than one million dollars
($1,000,000.00), except that this subparagraph shall not apply to any fee
officer elected within the consolidated local government.
(14) (a) The consolidated local government council shall establish a Government
Oversight and Audit Committee. This committee shall be:
1. Composed of members from each of the two (2) largest political
caucuses in the legislative council;
2. Appointed by the chairs of their respective caucuses; and
3. Composed on the basis of the proportion of each of the two (2) caucuses'
Page 13 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
total membership as compared to the total membership of the legislative
council. Any fractional proportions shall be rounded in the favor of the
smallest caucus' membership on the committee.
(b) The committee shall have the power to:
1. Compel testimony and the submission of work papers or documents;
2. Issue subpoenas to compel any officer, appointee, or former officer or
appointee to a board or commission described in subsection (13)(f) of
this section or any department or division of the consolidated local
government to appear before the committee and to compel the
submission to the committee of any work papers or documents pertinent
to an independent audit or investigation. Any subpoenas issued or
testimony compelled shall be subject to any relevant statutes concerning
privacy. Testimony subject to KRS 61.810 shall only be taken in
executive session. The right to privacy or the requirement that testimony
be taken in executive session may be waived by the person or entity
being subpoenaed or compelled to testify;
3. Petition the appropriate Circuit Court to compel obedience by
proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena
issued from the Circuit Court or a refusal to testify therein, if any officer
or appointee fails or refuses to testify or furnish the work papers or
documents subpoenaed;
4. Administer oaths to witnesses appearing before the committee when the
committee deems the administration of an oath necessary and advisable
as provided by law. This decision to administer oaths shall be taken by a
majority vote of the committee of the legislative council; and
5. Recommend the removal of any appointee to a board or commission
described in subsection (13)(f) of this section.
Page 14 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
(c) The legislative council of the consolidated local government shall adopt by
resolution any process or procedures deemed necessary for the administration
of subpoenas and oaths.
(d) The legislative council of the consolidated local government may only act to
remove an appointee to a board or commission described in subsection (13)(f)
of this section upon the recommendation of the Government Oversight and
Audit Committee.
(e) The Government Oversight and Audit Committee shall have the power to
issue subpoenas or administer oaths. Except as provided in KRS 65.003(7),
the legislative council of the consolidated local government shall not delegate
those powers to any other entity or entities not a part of the legislative council
of the consolidated local government.
(15) Any regulation or other lawful instrument issued:
(a) By a board that is operating under the provisions of KRS Chapter 109 or
212; and
(b) That is applicable to individuals residing or businesses operating within the
jurisdiction of the consolidated local government as relates to these
individuals' or business's conduct;
shall expire within thirty (30) days of its issuance if not approved by the
consolidated local government council.
(16) The consolidated local government council shall be known as the legislative council
of ...................../................... County Metro Government, which shall be a
combination of the names of the largest city in existence in the county on the date
of the adoption of the consolidated local government and the county.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 67C IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There shall be an office of internal audit within the consolidated local
Page 15 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
government that shall be separate from any other agency or department of the
consolidated local government. The office shall report directly to the mayor and
the legislative council. The office shall have a sufficient budget to conduct the
activities and fulfill the responsibilities set out by this section and by any
ordinances passed by the consolidated local government council.
(2) The office of internal audit shall be authorized to conduct financial and
performance audits and reviews of all departments, offices, boards, and activities
of the consolidated local government and have any other duties, powers, and
authorities as set out by ordinance.
(3) The office of internal audit shall be headed by a chief audit executive, which
shall be an elected position. The chief audit executive shall:
(a) 1. Be at least twenty-one (21) years old;
2. A qualified voter; and
3. A resident of the territory encompassing the consolidated local
government for a period of at least one (1) year prior to his or her
election;
(b) Continue to reside within the geographic boundary of the consolidated local
government throughout his or her term of office; and
(c) Have any additional qualifications as determined by ordinance of the
consolidated local government council.
(4) The chief audit executive shall be nominated and elected in nonpartisan elections
for a term of four (4) years in the same election years as other local government
officials as regulated by the regular election laws of the Commonwealth.
(5) The chief audit executive:
(a) Shall assume office on the first Monday in January following his or her
election and shall serve until a successor qualifies; and
(b) May serve for consecutive terms, but shall not serve more than three (3)
Page 16 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1345
terms cumulatively.
(6) The chief audit executive may be removed for cause. The consolidated local
government council shall sit as a court, under oath, when charges are preferred
by the mayor or by any four (4) members of the consolidated local government
council. No council member shall sit as a member when the council commences a
removal hearing.
(7) If a vacancy occurs in the office of chief audit executive, then it shall be filled in
accordance with Section 152 of the Constitution of Kentucky. If an appointment
is required, it shall be made by the mayor and shall be approved by resolution of
the consolidated local government council.
Section 5. The terms of the ethics commission members currently serving in a
consolidated local government shall end on December 31, 2025. In making new
appointments set forth in subsection (8) of Section 2 of this Act, the mayor shall appoint
one member for a four year term and two members for a two year term, and the two
largest political caucuses each appoint one member for a four year term and one member
for a two year term. On December 31, 2028, the term of one (1) member appointed by the
mayor shall expire, as determined by the mayor, and a new member shall be appointed by
the chief audit executive of the office of internal audit of the consolidated local
government as set out in Section 2 of this Act.
Section 6. The effective date of Section 4 of this Act shall be November 1,
2027. The term of any chief audit executive serving by appointment prior to the effective
date of Section 4 of this Act shall end on the first Monday in January 2029 when the first
elected chief audit executive takes office and is qualified after the November 2028
regular election.
Page 17 of 17
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:30 PM Jacketed